Washington statutes.
RCW 4.84.270

Attorneys' fees as costs in damage actions of ten thousand dollars or less—When defendant deemed prevailing party.

The defendant, or party resisting relief, shall be deemed the prevailing party within the meaning of RCW 4.84.250, if the plaintiff, or party seeking relief in an action for damages where the amount pleaded, exclusive of costs, is equal to or less than the maximum allowed under RCW 4.84.250, recovers nothing, or if the recovery, exclusive of costs, is the same or less than the amount offered in settlement by the defendant, or the party resisting relief, as set forth in RCW 4.84.280.

[ 1980 c 94 s 2; 1973 c 84 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1980 c 94: See note following RCW 4.84.250.